District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2704

License fee.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1887, 24 Stat. 427, ch. 272, § 4
Mar. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 1284, ch. 545
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1238, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2404.
1973 Ed., § 2-1504.

Prior Codifications